foma/verb/ThamizhiFST-C12.foma
### Tamil.foma ###

read lexc ThamizhiVerbs-C12.lexc
define Lexicon;

######### Rewrite rules

define C12Rule1 {ய} -> {யக்க}  || _ "^" [{ும்}| {ா} | {ி}| {அ}];
define C12Rule2 {ண} -> {ணக்க}  || _ "^" [{ும்}| {ா} | {ி}| {அ}];
define C12Rule3 {ள} -> {ளக்க}  || _ "^" [{ும்}| {ா} | {ி}| {அ}];
define C12Rule4 {ல} -> {வக்க}  || _ "^" [{ும்}| {ா} | {ி}| {அ}];
define C12Rule5 {ற} -> {றக்க}  || _ "^" [{ும்}| {ா} | {ி}| {அ}];
define C12Rule6 {ழ} -> {ழக்க}  || _ "^" [{ும்}| {ா} | {ி}| {அ}];

define C12Rule7 {ட} -> {டக்க}  || _ "^" [{ும்}| {ா} | {ி}| {அ}];
define C12Rule8 {ு} -> {ுக்க}  || _ "^" [{ும்}| {ா} | {ி}| {அ}];
define C12Rule8 {ு} -> {க்க}  || _ "^" [{க} | {அ}];


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup1 "அ" -> 0 || "^" _;
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;


define ClassTwelveGrammar 	Lexicon           	.o.
			C12Rule1           	.o.
			C12Rule2           	.o.
			C12Rule3           	.o.
			C12Rule4           	.o.
			C12Rule5           	.o.
			C12Rule6           	.o.
			C12Rule7           	.o.
			C12Rule8           	.o.
			Cleanup1		.o.
			Cleanup;

regex ClassTwelveGrammar;
